Utah statutes.
19-9-111.   Cost of acquisition or improvement of facility.

The cost of acquisition or improvement of any facility shall be considered to include:

(1)  the actual cost of land acquisition and improvements to the land; and

(2)  the actual cost of construction, alteration, or remodeling of a facility, including maintenance and the cost of equipping it; the cost of architectural and engineering fees; the cost of legal and accounting fees incurred incident to issuance of such obligations; the cost of fees for financial advisors and printing; and the interest on such obligations for a reasonable period of time.

